Rhode Island, session 2025, SB528.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 31-17-5.1 of the General Laws in Chapter 31-17 entitled "Right-Of-
Way" is hereby amended to read as follows:
31-17-5.1. Penalties.
Any person who violates any provision of §§ 31-17-1 — 31-17-5, pertaining to the right-
of-way of pedestrians, upon conviction, shall be sentenced to pay a fine of not more than seventy-
five ($75.00) subject to the fines enumerated in § 31-41.1-4.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC001666
========